Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202581-3501
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-3501 to 81-3550 shall be known and may be cited as the Geologists Regulation Act.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 49;

Laws 2004, LB 890, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB38, § 1.